lexc-files/roots/noun/proper_noun_roots.txt
LEXICON GuessedForeign
0:0     NounInflI ;
0:-     NounTagI;    ! Guessed foreign name
0:-     NounTagII;   ! Guessed foreign name
0:-     NounTagIII;  ! Guessed foreign name
0:-     NounTagIV;   ! Guessed foreign name
0:-     NounTagV;    ! Guessed foreign name
0:-     NounTagVI;   ! Guessed foreign name
0:-     NounTagVII;  ! Guessed foreign name
0:-     NounTagVIII; ! Guessed foreign name
0:-     NounTagIV;   ! Guessed foreign name
